Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF2744.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Laws 2023, chapter 62, article 1, section 47, is amended to read: Sec. 47. ST. ANTHONY FALLS STUDY. $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2024 is appropriated from the general fund to the Board of Regents of the University of Minnesota for a geophysical study and hazard assessment of the St. Anthony Falls area and St. Anthony Falls cutoff wall. The study must include a field-based investigation of the cutoff wall and other subsurface structures, modeling of the surrounding area, examination of public safety and infrastructure risks posed by potential failure of the cutoff wall or surrounding area, and emergency response plan for identified risks. By conducting this study, the Board of Regents does not consent to accepting liability for the current condition or risks posed by a potential failure of the cutoff wall. By July 1, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end , the Board of Regents must submit a report to the legislative committees with jurisdiction over state and local government policy and finance. This appropriation is available until June 30, deleted text begin 2025deleted text end new text begin 2026new text end . new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end